District of Columbia statutes.
34-1106

Property to be valued as of time of evaluation.

The Commission shall value the property of every public utility within the District of Columbia actually used and useful for the convenience of the public at the fair value thereof at the time of said valuation.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 978, ch. 150, § 8, par. 7
Investigations of public utilities, assessing expenses, see § 34-912.
Valuation instruction, Commission’s request from court of appeals, see § 34-604.
This section is referenced in § 34-912.
1981 Ed., § 43-506.
1973 Ed., § 43-306.